Mississippi, session 2026, SB3318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the University of Mississippi for the purpose of funding the Center for Mississippi Medical Cannabis Research created by Chapter 317, Laws of 2024, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................................. ................................................ $ 1,500,000.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.